Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-201
Department of Justice; Attorney General; head.

There is hereby constituted an executive department to be known as the Department of Justice, and the Attorney General shall be the head of this department.

Laws 1919, c. 205, § 1, p. 904;

C.S.1922, § 4834;

C.S.1929, § 84-201;

R.S.1943, § 84-201.

Attorney General has right to appeal from order of State Board of Equalization and Assessment. State ex rel. Sorensen v. State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 123 Neb. 259, 242 N.W. 609 (1932), 243 N.W. 264 (1932).

Attorney General on own initiative had authority to maintain suit to enjoin repeated violations of anti-gambling statutes in form of pari-mutuel betting on horse races. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Ak-Sar-Ben Exposition Co., 121 Neb. 248, 236 N.W. 736 (1931).

Attorney General is clothed with power to prosecute criminal actions in any county in the state. Lower v. State, 106 Neb. 666, 184 N.W. 174 (1921).